Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.510

Resort contracts—Nonapplicability of certain laws—County and city powers.

Camping resort contracts registered under this chapter are exempt from the provisions of chapters 21.20 and * 58.19 RCW and any act in this state regulating the offer and sale of land developments, real estate cooperatives, or time shares. Nothing in this chapter prevents counties or cities from enacting ordinances or resolutions setting platting or subdivision requirements solely for camping resorts or for camping resorts as subdivisions or binding site plans if appropriate to chapter 58.17 RCW or local ordinances.

[ 1988 c 159 s 25; 1982 c 69 s 22.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 58.19 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2024 c 321 s 504, effective January 1, 2028.